Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.040

Limitations on area included—Interlocal agreements.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no legislative authority may establish a tourism promotion area that includes within the boundaries of the area:

(a) Any portion of an incorporated city or town, if the legislative authority is that of the county; and

(b) Any portion of the county outside of an incorporated city or town, if the legislative authority is that of the city or town.

(2) By interlocal agreement adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, a county, city, or town may establish a tourism promotion area that includes within the boundaries of the area portions of its own jurisdiction and another jurisdiction, if the other jurisdiction is party to the agreement.

[ 2003 c 148 s 4.]